Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB534.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7701(b) and 7702(a) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7701. Blind veteran's pension.* * *(b) Amount and eligibility.--In addition to any other assistance provided by the Commonwealth and in addition to any compensation provided by the Federal Government, every blind veteran shall be paid a pension of [$150] $180 per month. Applications for such pensions shall be made to and in the form prescribed by the department. The Adjutant General shall have the power, and it shall be his duty to determine the eligibility of every applicant for a pension, and his decision in the matter 123456789101112131415161718 shall be final.§ 7702. Amputee and paralyzed veteran's pension.(a) Amount and eligibility.--In addition to any other assistance provided by the Commonwealth and in addition to any compensation provided by the Federal Government, every amputee and paralyzed veteran shall be paid a pension of [$150] $180 per month. Applications for the pensions shall be made to and in the form prescribed by the department. The Adjutant General shall determine the eligibility of every applicant for a pension, and his decision in the matter shall be final.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0534PN0505 - 2 - 123456789101112